Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-163
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 84-162 to 84-167, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Vital resource crisis shall mean the occurrence or imminent threat of widespread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property resulting from the shortage of any vital resource as the result of interruption or shortage of electricity, petroleum-based fuels, uranium, coal, or any other form of energy; and

(2) Vital resource shall include food for domestic use, water for domestic, agricultural, or industrial use, and electricity, petroleum-based fuels, uranium, coal, or any other form of energy.

Laws 1980, LB 954, § 52.